Illinois, session 104th, HB573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Fair Gaming Act is amended by 5changing Section 30-1 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 50/30-1)7    Sec. 30-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the State Fair Gaming Act. References in this Article to "this 9Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)